Utah statutes.
23-13-14.   Release of wildlife unlawful -- Penalty.

It is unlawful for any person to release any terrestrial or aquatic wildlife into the wild except as provided in this title. Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 76, 1986 General Session

